California statutes. Water Code
Before filing its report the board shall announce it in the form of a draft.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2014.

The board shall mail notice of the draft, together with a copy of the draft, to the parties or their attorneys.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2015.

Within 30 days after the date of the mailing of the draft, or within such further time as the court may for good cause allow, any party may file objections to it with the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 132.)
-------------------------------------------

2016.

After the objections have been considered by the board or a hearing has been held thereon if deemed advisable by it, the board shall file its report as referee with the clerk of the court and give notice by mail of the filing of its report to the parties or their attorneys.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2017.

The report of the board as referee is subject to review by the court upon exceptions thereto filed with the clerk of the court within 30 days after date of mailing notice of the filing of the report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2018.

No exception to the report shall be considered, except in the court’s discretion or for good cause shown, unless it appears that the matter of the exception was presented to the board in the form of an objection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2019.

The report filed by the board is prima facie evidence of the physical facts therein found; but the court shall hear such evidence as may be offered by any party to rebut the report or the prima facie evidence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2020.

(a) At any time after filing of the report by the board as provided in Section 2016 the board, if it appears that underground water is being pumped in an amount which, if not restricted, would destroy or irreparably injure the waters of the basin due to ocean water intrusion before final judgment can be had, may, on notice, pursuant to the provisions of Section 527 of the Code of Civil Procedure, apply to the court for a preliminary injunction, restricting the pumping of water of the basin so as to avoid irreparable injury to, or destruction of, the waters of the basin, and the court may issue the injunction, subject to the provisions of Section 2021, equitably restricting and apportioning the reduction in the pumping of water.

(b) The provisions of this section apply only to actions to determine rights to waters of underground basins located in the arid, southern coastal area defined by the exterior boundaries of the Counties of Santa Barbara, Ventura, Los Angeles, Orange, and San Diego.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 403.)
-------------------------------------------

2021.

Where a preliminary injunction has been granted pursuant to Section 2020, the final judgment shall equitably compensate in quantities of water for such variations as there may be between the rights of the parties to the use of water on which such preliminary injunction is based, and as such rights are determined in such final judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1690.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Expenses of Reference [2040. - 2048.]

2040.

In acting pursuant to this chapter the board shall not be entitled to any fee for its services but shall be paid or reimbursed the total expense incurred by it, including salaries, wages, traveling expenses, and all costs of whatsoever character which are properly chargeable to the reference.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2041.

If the funds available for use by the board are inadequate to permit it to advance the expense of a reference, or if in its opinion the payment of the expense of any reference is not reasonably certain, the board shall refuse to undertake a reference unless and until adequate provision is made by the parties and approved by the court for the payment of the expenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2042.

During the pendency of any reference, upon motion of the board and upon a hearing by the court after at least 10 days’ notice to the parties, the court may order such interim or partial payments of the expense to be made by the parties as it deems proper and equitable under the circumstances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2043.

The total expense shall be equitably apportioned by the board against the parties to the suit, and a statement thereof and of the apportionment shall be sent by registered mail by the board to the parties and filed with the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2045.

Upon application in writing by any party aggrieved within 30 days after the statement of final expense and its apportionment has been mailed to the parties, the court shall after expiration of that period set a hearing for the determination of any objections to the expense of the reference or to the apportionment thereof. The clerk of the court shall, at least 10 days prior to the date of hearing, give notice thereof by mail to all parties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 631.)
-------------------------------------------

2046.

Any party failing to object to the expense of a reference or the apportionment thereof is conclusively deemed to have waived all objection thereto.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

2047.

If no objection is filed with the court within the prescribed period, the court upon ex parte application of the board shall enter a judgment against the parties in favor of the board in the amounts apportioned to them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 329.)
-------------------------------------------

2048.

Upon the hearing of objections to the expense or the apportionment thereof the court shall determine the expense and its apportionment as the court deems equitable and shall enter judgment against the parties in favor of the board in the amounts apportioned to them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 329.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. References in Federal Courts [2075. - 2076.]

2075.

In case suit is brought in a federal court for determination of rights to water within, or partially within, this State, the board may accept a reference of such suit as master or referee for the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2076.

In acting under this chapter the board shall proceed according to the rules of practice and procedure of the court or as otherwise directed by the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Adjudications to Protect the Quality of Ground Water [2100. - 2102.]

2100.

After the department has submitted to the board recommendations for the protection of the quality of ground water pursuant to Section 12617.1 or 12923.1 of this code, or in reliance upon investigation by any governmental agency, the board may file an action in the superior court to restrict pumping, or to impose physical solutions, or both, to the extent necessary to prevent destruction of or irreparable injury to the quality of such water. In such action, all of the claimants to the use of the affected water known to the board, except claimants to the use of minor quantities of water as defined in Section 2102, shall be named as defendants. In any watershed or ground water basin wherein (a) all or substantially all of the rights to water have been adjudicated and the court has retained continuing jurisdiction arising from the adjudication, or (b) wherein such action is pending, any such proceedings by the board shall be undertaken only by intervention by the board in such existing action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

2101.

(a) Before filing or intervening in any such action the board shall hold a public hearing on the necessity for restricting ground water pumping or for a physical solution in order to protect the quality of water from destruction or irreparable injury. The board shall serve notice of such hearing as provided in Section 6066 of the Government Code and shall mail a copy of such notice to each producer of ground water within the area proposed for investigation, to the extent that such producers of ground water are known to the board, at least 15 days prior to the date of such hearing, except that notice need not be mailed to producers of minor quantities of water as defined in Section 2102.

(b) In the event the board decides that the rights to the use of the ground water must be adjudicated in order to require the restriction of pumping or physical solution necessary to preserve it from destruction or irreparable injury to quality, the board shall first determine whether any local public agency overlying all or a part of the ground water basin will undertake such adjudication of water rights. If such local agency commences an adjudication, the board shall take no further action, except that the board may, through the Attorney General, become a party to such action.

(c) In the event no local agency commences such action within 90 days after notice of the decision of the board, the board shall file such action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

2102.

As used in this article, “minor quantities of water” refers to the extraction by any person of not to exceed 10 acre-feet of ground water annually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Statutory Adjudications [2500. - 2868.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [2500. - 2503.]

2500.

As used in this chapter, “stream system” includes stream, lake, or other body of water, and tributaries and contributory sources, but does not include an underground water supply other than a subterranean stream flowing through known and definite channels.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

2500.5.

(a) As used in this chapter with respect to the Scott River in Siskiyou County, “stream system” includes ground water supplies which are interconnected with the Scott River, but does not include any other underground water supply.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that by reason of the geology and hydrology of the Scott River, it is necessary to include interconnected ground waters in any determination of the rights to the water of the Scott River as a foundation for a fair and effective judgment of such rights, and that it is necessary that the provisions of this section apply to the Scott River only.

(c) If this section is for any reason held to be unconstitutional, such decision shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this chapter, or of any proceedings thereunder, but shall affect only the validity of the proceedings with respect to such interconnected ground water supplies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 794.)
-------------------------------------------

2501.

The board may determine, in the proceedings provided for in this chapter, all rights to water of a stream system whether based upon appropriation, riparian right, or other basis of right.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2502.

If the board finds that the use by any persons under claim of right of only minor quantities of water, as defined in Section 2503, would have no material effect on the rights of other claimants, the board may exempt such persons from being subject to these proceedings as claimants or parties with respect to such minor quantities of water; provided, that any person so exempted may elect to continue to be subject to these proceedings by giving prompt notice to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 794.)
-------------------------------------------

2503.

As used in this chapter, “minor quantities of water” refers to the diversion or extraction by any person of not to exceed 10 acre-feet of water annually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 794.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Petition and Preliminary Proceedings [2525. - 2529.]

2525.

Upon petition signed by one or more claimants to water of any stream system, requesting the determination of the rights of the various claimants to the water of that stream system, the board shall, if, upon investigation, it finds the facts and conditions are such that the public interest and necessity will be served by a determination of the water rights involved, enter an order granting the petition and make proper arrangements to proceed with the determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2526.

As soon as practicable after granting the petition the board shall prepare and issue a notice setting forth the following:

(a) The facts of the entry of the order and of the pendency of the proceedings;

(b) That all claimants to rights to the use of water of the stream system are required to inform the board within 60 days from the date of the notice, or such further time as the board may allow, of their intention to file proof of claim; 

(c) The date prior to which all claimants to rights to the water of the stream system shall notify the board in writing of their intention to file proof of claim and the address to which all subsequent notices to the claimant relating to the proceedings may be sent;

(d) A statement that all claimants will be required to make proof of their claims at a time to be fixed by the board after the conclusion of its investigation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

2527.

The notice shall be published at least once a week for four consecutive weeks, commencing within 20 days of the date of issuance of the notice, in one or more newspapers of general circulation published in each county in which any part of the stream system is situated, and, within the same 20-day period, the notice shall be mailed to all persons known to the board who own land that appears to be riparian to the stream system or who divert water from the stream system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

2528.

Whenever proceedings are instituted for the determination of rights to water, it is the duty of all claimants interested therein and having notice thereof as provided in this chapter, to notify the board of their intention to file proof of claim and to appear and submit proof of their respective claims at the time and in the manner required by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 53.)
-------------------------------------------

2529.

(a) Within 60 days after the date by which claimants to rights to the water of the stream system are required to notify the board in writing of their intention to file proof of claim, the board shall prepare and file for record, in the office of the county recorder of each county in which any part of the stream system is situated, a notice setting forth all of the following facts:

(1) The order has been entered and the proceedings are pending.

(2) Information regarding the status of the proceedings may be obtained from the board.

(3) The proceedings will result in a determination of the rights to water of the stream system.

(4) Any claimant who fails to appear and submit proof of his or her claim as provided in this chapter shall be held to have forfeited all rights to water previously claimed by him or her on the stream system, other than as provided in the decree, unless entitled to relief under the laws of this state.

(5) At the conclusion of the proceedings, the superior court will enter a decree determining the water rights appurtenant to each parcel identified in the notice, including the specific parcel against which this notice appears, and the decree may accord the claimant for that parcel water rights which are different from those he or she has claimed.

(b) The notice shall identify the current owners of each parcel that appears to be riparian to the stream system or to which water is diverted from the stream, and shall be recorded in a manner so that anyone researching the title of a parcel will find the notice.

(c) If the board subsequently identifies an additional parcel or parcels which appear to be riparian to the stream system or to which water is diverted from the stream, the board shall prepare and file for record a supplementary notice identifying the current owners of the additional parcels. The supplementary notice shall be recorded in the same manner as the original notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1654, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Investigation of Stream System [2550. - 2556.]

2550.

As soon as practicable after granting the petition, the board shall begin an investigation of the stream system, of the diversion of water, of all beneficial uses being made of the water, and of the water supply available for those uses, and shall gather such other data and information as may be essential to the proper determination of the water rights in the stream system.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

2551.

(a) During the investigation of the stream system, the representatives of the board shall investigate in detail the use of water by each person who has given notice of intent to file a proof of claim, and shall determine the acreage under irrigation or otherwise define the place of use and purpose of use, determine the location and capacity of the person’s diversion works and conduits conveying water from the stream system, and the amount of water diverted and reasonably required to satisfy the uses being made.

(b) In conducting investigations under this article, the board shall consider all pertinent information, including, but not limited to, information provided under
 Sections 1840 and 1841.

(c) Representatives of the board may conduct a field investigation of a person’s water use after giving 30 days’ notice in writing to the person subject to the investigation, or at the request of that person as part of the investigation of the stream system. It shall be the duty of each claimant to be present at some time during the detailed field investigation either in person or by an agent who is authorized to sign the proof of claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 422, Sec. 2.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2552.

Each claimant shall provide to the representatives of the board all pertinent information on the extent and nature of the claimant’s water use and basis of water right, so as to expedite the investigation and facilitate the completion of the proof of claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 422, Sec. 3.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2553.

Immediately upon conclusion of the investigation of water use, the claimant or the claimant’s representative shall be provided, by registered mail, a blank form of proof of claim and a copy of the factual determinations of the representatives of the board for use in preparing the proof of claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 422, Sec. 4.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2554.

During the investigation of the stream system, the board shall investigate in detail the projects of all water users known to the board who have not filed a notice of intent to file proof of claim. The investigations may include a field investigation in accordance with Section 2551, except that the water users need not be notified in advance of the investigation and, if not notified, are not required to be present during the field investigation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 422, Sec. 5.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2555.

Water users who do not file notice of intent shall, insofar as they are known, be supplied a copy of the factual determinations of the representative of the board and a blank form of proof of claim and shall be allowed to file proof of claim after completion of the detailed investigation of their project by the representatives of the board on the same basis as persons who were present and who filed timely notices of intent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 422, Sec. 6.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2556.

(a) In conducting an investigation pursuant to this chapter, if the board determines in writing that the information provided by the person pursuant to Sections 1840 and 1841 and any regulations adopted by the board pursuant to those sections is inadequate for the board’s investigation, the board may issue an information order to any person or entity that diverts or uses water or claims a water right to prepare and submit to the board any technical or monitoring program reports related to that diversion or use, or to submit any report of the basis for that claimed water right, as the board may specify.

(b) The burden of preparing the report, including costs, shall bear a reasonable relationship to the need for the requested information and the benefits to be obtained from the board receiving that information. In making a request, the board shall do both of the following:

(1) Provide the person to whom the request is directed with a written explanation with regard to the need for the information.

(2) Identify the evidence that supports requiring that person to provide the information.

(c) If the preparation of individual reports would result in a duplication of effort, the board may order any person or
 entity subject to the order to pay a reasonable share of the cost of preparing reports. 

(d) In conducting an investigation pursuant to this chapter, the board may inspect property or facilities where water is claimed to be used, diverted, or conveyed. The board is authorized to obtain
 an inspection warrant pursuant to the procedure set forth in Title 13 (commencing with Section 1822.50) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure for purposes of an inspection pursuant to this subdivision.

(e) A person or entity who receives an information order shall respond within 75 days of the date of the information order. An information order issued pursuant to this section may include a requirement that the recipient update the information annually while an adjudication is pending. A recipient of an order may request from the board an extension of time to respond to the information order for good cause shown, which request shall not be unreasonably denied.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 422, Sec. 7.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Proof of Claim [2575. - 2577.]

2575.

The proof of claim shall be filed with the board on the form provided by the board and shall include all of the following:

(a) The name and post office address of the claimant.

(b) The nature of the right on which the claim is based, the date upon which it was initiated, and the purpose of use.

(c) A description of any works of diversion or distribution and the date such works were constructed.

(d) The character of the soil and the location, area, and kind of crops irrigated, if any; the season of use; and the amount of water required and diverted. 

(e) The number of people served water, if any.

(f) Such other facts as the board requires to show the extent and nature of the right and compliance with the law in acquiring it.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

2576.

Each claimant shall certify to the proof of claim statements under oath or penalty of perjury.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

2577.

Any person not submitting a proof of claim to the board or to representatives of the board by the conclusion of the investigation shall be notified in writing that such person’s rights will be entered in the preliminary order of determination by the board based on the measurements and information gathered during the investigation unless a claim is submitted within 30 days of such notification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Report and Preliminary Order of Determination [2600. - 2604.]

2600.

After all investigations of water use have been completed and the time for filing proofs of claims has expired, the board shall prepare a report describing the water supply and abstracting the claim of water right of each claimant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 422, Sec. 8.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2601.

The report shall note separately any material differences between the claims and the factual determinations made by the representatives of the board during the investigation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

2602.

The report shall include a map showing the stream system, diversion points, conduits, areas of water use and the type of use, owner’s names, and such other information as the board deems necessary.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

2603.

The report shall include a preliminary order of determination determining and establishing the several rights to the water of the stream system, giving appropriate consideration to claims at variance with the measurements and determinations of the representatives of the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

2604.

A copy of the report shall be sent by registered mail to each claimant and to each person not filing a claim appearing in the report as a water user. It shall be accompanied by a notice setting a day at least 60 days thereafter, prior to which such persons may file objections to any portion of the report, including the preliminary order of determination.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Objections to the Report [2625. - 2628.]

2625.

The notice shall also set a time and place reasonably convenient to the claimants when and where the proofs of claim and measurements and other data collected by the board during the proceedings will be open and available for inspection by all interested persons. The period of inspection shall be fixed by the board but shall be not less than five days.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

2626.

A representative of the board shall be present at the time and place designated in the notice, and shall permit, during the period of inspection, any person interested to inspect such evidence and proofs of claim as have been filed.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

2627.

The period of inspection shall be concluded at least 30 days prior to the expiration of the time allowed claimants for filing objections to the report and preliminary order of determination.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

2628.

The objections shall be in writing and shall state with reasonable certainty the grounds of the objection.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Hearing of Objections [2650. - 2653.]

2650.

Within 10 days after the close of the period for filing objections, the board shall mail copies of the objections to the claimant or water user against whom the objections are directed and shall notify by registered mail the persons whose rights are significantly affected to appear before it at a time and place specified and at such time and place the objections will be heard. The time specified shall be as soon as practicable but not less than 15 days from the date of the mailing of the notice of hearing.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

2651.

The board may adjourn hearings of objections from time to time upon reasonable notice to all parties in interest.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

2652.

The costs of taking testimony at a hearing on an objection shall be borne by the parties thereto as follows: each party shall pay for the direct examination of his own witness and the cross-examination of opponent’s witness, and the parties shall share equally for that part of the examination directed by the representative of the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

2653.

One copy of the transcript of testimony taken at the hearing shall be furnished to the board at the cost of the parties.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Order of Determination [2700. - 2702.]

2700.

As soon as practicable after the hearing of objections or the expiration of the time for filing objections if no objections are filed, the board shall adopt an order determining and establishing the several rights to the water of the stream system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1654, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2701.

A notice of adoption of the order of determination and a copy of the order shall be sent by registered mail to each claimant and to each person whose rights are determined in the order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1654, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2702.

(a) The board may order a reconsideration of all or part of an order of determination on the board’s own motion or on petition of any party affected by the order. The petition shall be filed within 30 days after the notice required by Section 2701 is sent. The authority of the board to order a reconsideration on its own motion shall expire 30 days after the board has adopted the order. The board shall order or deny reconsideration on a petition for reconsideration within 90 days after the notice required by Section 2701 is sent.

(b) The order of determination may be reconsidered by the board on all the pertinent parts of the record and any arguments as may be permitted, or a further hearing may be held, upon notice to all affected parties, for the purpose of receiving additional evidence that the board may, for cause, allow. The order on reconsideration has the same force and effect as an original order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 230, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Hearing and Decree of Court [2750. - 2774.]

2750.

As soon as practicable after adoption of the order of determination, issuance of an order on reconsideration, or issuance of an order denying reconsideration, whichever is later, a certified copy of the order, together with the original evidence and transcript of testimony filed with or taken before the board and certified by it, shall be filed with the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the stream system, or some part thereof, is situated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1654, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

2751.

Upon the filing of the certified copy of the order of determination and the evidence and transcript, the board shall procure an order from the court setting a time for hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2752.

The clerk of the court shall immediately furnish the board with a certified copy of the order setting the time for hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2753.

Upon receiving the certified copy of the order setting the time for hearing, the board shall immediately mail a copy of the order by registered mail to each known party in interest at his last known place of residence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2754.

The board shall cause the order to be published at least once a week for four consecutive weeks in some newspaper of general circulation published in each county in which the stream system or any part thereof is situated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2755.

The board shall file with the clerk of the court proof of service by registered mail and by publication.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2756.

Service by registered mail and by publication shall be deemed full and sufficient notice to all parties in interest of the date and purpose of the hearing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

2757.

At least 10 days prior to the day set for hearing, each party in interest who is aggrieved or dissatisfied with the order of determination may file with the clerk of the court notice of exceptions to the order of determination.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

2758.

The notice of exceptions shall state briefly the exceptions taken, the reasons therefor, and the prayer for relief.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

2759.

A copy of each notice of exception shall be sent by registered mail at least 10 days prior to the hearing to the board and to each person who was an adverse party to any issue raised by the exception at a hearing of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

2760.

The order of determination, the statements or claims of claimants, and the exceptions made to the order of determination constitute the pleadings.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

2761.

The court may allow such additional or amended pleadings as may be necessary to a final determination of the proceeding.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

2762.

If no exceptions are filed, then on the day set for the hearing, on motion of the board, the court shall enter a decree affirming the order of determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2763.

On the day set for hearing all parties in interest who have filed notices of exceptions shall appear in person, or by counsel, and the court shall hear the matter or set the time for hearing, and shall continue the hearing until all exceptions are disposed of.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

2763.5.

(a) No exception to the order of determination shall be considered, except in the court’s discretion for good cause shown, unless the matter of the exception was presented to the board in the form of an objection. Good cause includes, but is not limited to, the existence of newly discovered relevant evidence which, in the exercise of reasonable diligence, could not have been presented to the board during the board’s proceedings.

(b) This section does not apply to persons to whom the board did not mail either (1) written notice of the board meeting at which the petition pursuant to Section 2525 is to be considered as an item of business, or (2) written notice of the pendency of the proceedings pursuant to Section 2526.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 572, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2764.

All proceedings on the hearing shall be as nearly as may be in accordance with the rules governing civil actions.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

2765.

Whenever in the judgment of the court the State is a necessary party to the action, the court shall make an order to that effect and thereupon a copy of all pleadings and proceedings on file with the court in the action shall be served upon the Attorney General who shall represent the State therein.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

2766.

For further information on any subject in controversy the court may employ one or more qualified persons to investigate and report thereon under oath, subject to examination by any party in interest as to his competency to give expert testimony on the subject.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

2767.

The court may take additional evidence on any issue and may, if necessary, refer the case for such further evidence to be taken by the board as the court may direct, and may require a further determination by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2768.

After the hearing, the court shall enter a decree determining the right of all persons involved in the proceeding.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

2769.

The decree shall in every case declare as to the water right adjudged to each party, the priority, amount, season of use, purpose of use, point of diversion, and place of use of the water; and as to water used for irrigation, the decree shall also declare the specific tracts of land to which it is appurtenant, together with such other factors as may be necessary to define the right.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

2770.

Upon the hearing the court may assess and adjudge against any party such costs as it may deem just.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

2771.

Appeals from the decree may be taken by the board or any party in interest, in the same manner and with the same effect as in civil cases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2772.

A certified copy of the decree shall be prepared by the clerk of the court, without charge, and filed for record in the office of the county recorder of each county in which any part of the stream system is situated and also in the office of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2773.

The decree is conclusive as to the rights of all existing claimants upon the stream system lawfully embraced in the determination.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

2774.
